Rhode Island statutes. Title 30 Military Affairs and Defense
Chapter 20 Veterans’ Professional Certificates

30-20-1.
Renewal upon discharge from service.

Any certificate, issued by authority of the laws of this state, authorizing a person to practice a specific profession regulated by the laws of this state or to carry on a special trade or business occupation, which expires while the holder thereof is in the military, naval, or air service of the United States, shall be renewed without further examination, upon payment of the prescribed fee, at any time within four (4) months after the person’s discharge from the service.

History of Section.

P.L. 1944, ch. 1453, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

30-20-1

.